Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.130

Public transportation for persons with special needs.

(1) Effective January 1, 2001, in addition to any other authority granted under this chapter, a county transportation authority may be created to purchase, acquire, maintain, operate, or lease transportation services, equipment, and facilities for public transportation limited only to persons with special needs by any method or combination of methods provided by the authority.

(2) As used in this section, "persons with special needs" means those persons, including their personal attendants, who because of physical or mental disability, income status, or age are unable to transport themselves or purchase transportation.

(3) The county transportation authority may fix, regulate, and control fares and rates to be charged for these transportation services.

[ 2001 c 89 s 1.]